Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, article V, section 2, will read: new text end Sec. 2. The term of office for the governor and lieutenant governor is four years and until a successor is chosen and qualified. new text begin No person may file to be a candidate for election to a third term as governor or to a third term as lieutenant governor. new text end Each shall have attained the age of 25 years and, shall have been a bona fide resident of the state for one year next preceding his election, and shall be a citizen of the United States. Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin The proposed amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to place limits on the terms of office for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . new text end new text begin " new text end